Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 76.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-176
Action on plan of conversion by converting
limited liability company.

(ULLCA
1007) (a) Subject to section 21-183, a plan of conversion must be consented
to by all the members of a converting limited liability company.

(b) Subject to section
21-183 and any contractual rights, after a conversion is approved, and at
any time before articles of conversion are delivered to the Secretary of State
for filing under section 21-177, a converting limited liability company may
amend the plan or abandon the conversion:

(1) as provided in the plan; or

(2) except as otherwise
prohibited in the plan, by the same consent as was required to approve the
plan.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 76.